Ohio, session 136, HB461.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That sections 341.193, 753.022, and 5120.052 of 7
the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: 8
Sec. 341.193. (A) As used in this section : 9
(1) "County correctional facility" means a county jail, 10
county workhouse, minimum security jail, joint city and county 11
workhouse, municipal-county correctional center, multicounty- 12
municipal correctional center, municipal-county jail or 13
workhouse, or multicounty-municipal jail or workhouse. 14
(2) "Teletypewriter" or "TTY" means a communication device 15
used by people who are deaf, hard of hearing, or have severe 16
speech impairment. 17
(B) Each county correctional facility shall provide every 18
inmate who is deaf, hard of hearing, or severely speech impaired 19

H. B. No. 461 Page 2
As Introduced
access to a teletypewriter at no cost to the inmate. 20
(C) No county correctional facility shall deny an inmate 21
who is deaf, hard of hearing, or severely speech impaired access 22
to a teletypewriter. 23
Sec. 753.022. (A) As used in this section : 24
(1) "Municipal correctional facility" means a municipal 25
jail, municipal workhouse, minimum security jail, joint city and 26
county workhouse, municipal-county correctional center, 27
multicounty-municipal correctional center, municipal-county jail 28
or workhouse, or multicounty-municipal jail or workhouse. 29
(2) "Teletypewriter" or "TTY" means a communication device 30
used by people who are deaf, hard of hearing, or have severe 31
speech impairment. 32
(B) Each municipal correctional facility shall provide 33
every inmate who is deaf, hard of hearing, or severely speech 34
impaired access to a teletypewriter at no cost to the inmate. 35
(C) No municipal correctional facility shall deny an 36
inmate who is deaf, hard of hearing, or severely speech impaired 37
access to a teletypewriter. 38
Sec. 5120.052. (A) As used in this section : 39
(1) "State correctional institution" has the same meaning 40
as in section 2967.01 of the Revised Code. 41
(2) "Teletypewriter" or "TTY" means a communication device 42
used by people who are deaf, hard of hearing, or have severe 43
speech impairment. 44
(B) Each state correctional institution shall provide 45
every inmate who is deaf, hard of hearing, or severely speech 46

H. B. No. 461 Page 3
As Introduced
impaired access to a teletypewriter at no cost to the inmate. 47
(C) No state correctional institution shall deny an inmate 48
who is deaf, hard of hearing, or severely speech impaired access 49
to a teletypewriter. 50